Utah statutes.
43-1-3.   Restrictive construction of title -- Effective date.

This title shall not be construed to limit or impair the negotiability or quasi negotiability, by agreement or otherwise, of any instrument whether or not defined herein. The provisions of this title shall apply only to instruments issued after the thirteenth day of May, 1929.

